Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.102.160

Educator conditional scholarship and loan repayment programs—Report.

Beginning November 1, 2020, and by November 1st each even-numbered year thereafter, the office shall submit a report, in accordance with RCW 43.01.036, to the appropriate committees of the legislature recommending whether the educator conditional scholarship and loan repayment programs under this chapter should be continued, modified, or terminated. The report must include information about the number of applicants for, and participants in, each program. To the extent possible, this information should be disaggregated by age, gender, race and ethnicity, family income, and unmet financial need. The report must include information about participant deferments and repayments. The report must also include information on moneys received by and disbursed from the educator conditional scholarship account under RCW 28B.102.080 each fiscal year.

[ 2019 c 295 s 223.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.